Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.555

Washington rescue plan transition account.

The Washington rescue plan transition account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Revenues to the account consist of moneys directed by the legislature to the account. Allowable uses of moneys in the account include responding to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic including those related to education, human services, health care, and the economy. In addition, the legislature may appropriate from the account to continue activities begun with, or augmented with, COVID-19 related federal funding. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Washington rescue plan transition account to the state general fund.

[ 2023 c 475 s 929; 2022 c 157 s 5. Prior: 2021 c 334 s 1902.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 334: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 2021 c 334 s 1906.]

Effective date—2021 c 334: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 18, 2021]." [ 2021 c 334 s 1908.]